District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.94

Dissolution of the District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company.

The District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company, an instrumentality established by the District of Columbia Free Clinic Captive Insurance Company Establishment Emergency Act of 2007, effective October 3, 2007 (D.C. Act 17-113; 54 DCR 9977 ), is dissolved. All of its assets (including cash, accounts receivable, reserve funds, real or personal property, and contract and other rights), positions, personnel, and records, and the unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to it, are transferred to the Agency.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 15, 55 DCR 6261